Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13.02, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Political subdivision. "Political subdivision" means any county, statutory or home rule charter city, school district, special district, deleted text begin anydeleted text end town deleted text begin exercising powers under chapter 368 and located in the metropolitan area, as defined in section 473.121, subdivision 2deleted text end , and any board, commission, districtnew text begin ,new text end or authority created pursuant to law, local ordinancenew text begin ,new text end or charter provision. It includes any nonprofit corporation which is a community action agency organized pursuant to the Economic Opportunity Act of 1964 (Public Law 88-452) as amended, to qualify for public funds, or any nonprofit social service agency which performs services under contract to a government entity, to the extent that the nonprofit social service agency or nonprofit corporation collects, stores, disseminates, and uses data on individuals because of a contractual relationship with a government entity.